District of Columbia statutes.
34-502

Certificate showing authority to issue stock or pay dividends to be obtained.

No public utility shall hereafter issue any stocks, stock certificates, bonds, mortgages, or any other evidences of indebtedness payable in more than 1 year from date, or pay any stock, bond or scrip dividend, until it shall have first obtained the certificate of the Commission showing authority for such issue from the Commission.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 990, ch. 150, § 8, par. 73
Aug. 4, 1955, 69 Stat. 485, ch. 545, § 2
Penal provisions, stock issue by false statements, see § 34-701.
1981 Ed., § 43-702.
1973 Ed., § 43-802.